Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-315
Partnership or unincorporated association; security for costs.

In cases where a company shall sue in its partnership name, such company shall procure the writ to be endorsed by a responsible surety, who is a resident of the county, for costs, or otherwise give security for costs.

R.S.1867, Code § 26, p. 397;

R.S.1913, § 7596;

C.S.1922, § 8539;

C.S.1929, § 20-315;

R.S.1943, § 25-315.

In action against partners individually, upon a judgment obtained against firm, petition must allege partnership property is insufficient to satisfy judgment. Leach v. Milburn Wagon Co., 14 Neb. 106, 15 N.W. 232 (1883); Ruth v. Lowrey & Upton, 10 Neb. 260, 4 N.W. 977 (1880).

Security should be given before delivery of summons for service. Haskins v. Citizens Bank, 12 Neb. 39, 10 N.W. 466 (1881).

Security for costs is an essential prerequisite to maintenance of action. Burlington & M. R. R. Co. v. Dick & Son, 7 Neb. 242 (1878).